District of Columbia statutes.
26-907

Violations.

(a)

A person violating any provision of this chapter shall, upon conviction, be fined $300, imprisoned for not less than 30 days or more than 90 days, or both. In addition, the court may order any person violating this chapter to make restitution for the value of property illegally obtained as a result of the violation. Prosecutions for violations of this chapter or any rules issued pursuant to this chapter shall be conducted in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia by the Corporation Counsel or any of his or her assistants in the name of the District of Columbia.

(b)

Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this chapter, or any rules or regulations issued under the authority of this chapter, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infraction of this chapter shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

Feb. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 659, ch. 26, § 7
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 466, 32 DCR 4450
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-188, § 2(c), 33 DCR 7687
Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-237, § 5, 38 DCR 314
1981 Ed., § 26-707.
1973 Ed., § 26-607.